California, session 20252026, AB2580.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 44320.1 is added to the Education Code, to read:44320.1. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the Chancellor of the California State University shall develop a plan to increase professional teacher preparation partnerships between California State University campuses and community college districts. The plan shall address at least both of the following:(1) The expansion of online programs of professional preparation offered by the California State University in partnership with community college districts to increase access and opportunities for students pursuing teaching careers in rural communities.(2) The expansion of educator preparation pathways between community college districts and the California State University to include opportunities for concurrent enrollment at the California State University in teacher preparation coursework for community college students pursuing a teaching credential.(b) Implementation of the plan developed pursuant to subdivision (a) is contingent upon an appropriation being made for its purposes in the annual Budget Act or another statute.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.